test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-tervues4_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - `tervüs1: # Noun (4) `tervüs1 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     tervüs+N+Sg+Nom: tervüs
     tervüs+N+Sg+Gen: tervü
     tervüs+N+Sg+Par: tervüt
     tervüs+N+Sg+Ill: tervühe
     tervüs+N+Pl+Gen: tervüide
     tervüs+N+Pl+Par: tervüid
     tervüs+N+Pl+Ill: tervüihe
     tervüs+N+Pl+All: tervüile
